District of Columbia statutes.
9-510

Increase in number of street lamps authorized.

The proper authorities are directed to increase from time to time, as the public good may require, the number of street lamps on any of the streets, lanes, alleys, public ways, and grounds, in the City of Washington, and to do any and all things pertaining to the well lighting of the City.

R.S., D.C., § 233

History

1981 Ed., § 7-710.
1973 Ed., § 7-710.

Prior Codifications